Washington statutes.
RCW 16.60.085

Temporary gate across highway—Auditor may grant permit.

It shall be lawful for the auditor of any county to grant such permit in vacation, but his or her license shall not extend past the next meeting of the commissioner's court.

[ 2011 c 336 s 431; Code 1881, Bagley's Supp., p 25 s 2; 1871 p 104 s 2; RRS s 5460. Formerly RCW 16.60.080, part.]